Wyoming statutes. Title 34 Property, Conveyances and Security Transactions
Chapter 24 Uniform Unclaimed Property Act

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1993, ch. 70, § 1, enacted a chapter 24 (§§

34-24-101

through

34-24-108

), which has been redesignated as chapter 25 (§§

34-25-101

through

34-25-108

) in light of the enactment of chapter 24 by Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 8, provides: “Any unclaimed property with a value of fifty dollars ($50.00) or more held by the state at the time the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act becomes effective shall be covered by this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for loss of hat, coat, or other property deposited by customer in place of business, 54 ALR5th 393.

§ 34-24-101.
Short title; policy statement; uniform construction.

This act may be cited as the “Uniform Unclaimed Property Act.”

Property shall be deemed to be “abandoned” or “unclaimed” when:

It is held, issued or owing by a holder;

The identity, status or present location of the apparent owner is unknown; and

The property cannot be paid, distributed or given to the apparent owner after the dormancy period stated for the type of unclaimed property in this act.

Property shall not be deemed to be “abandoned” or “unclaimed” while the character or degree of ownership interest of the apparent owner in the property is unsettled or disputed and the holder is notified of this fact.

All unclaimed property shall be placed in the custody of the administrator, subject to the perpetual right of the party originally owning or being entitled to the property to reclaim it upon proper proof of ownership and identity. Except for escrow agreements pursuant to W.S.

30-5-302

, any provision, contract, agreement, practice, resolution, ordinance, decision, order or understanding, shall be void as contrary to this public policy, if the purpose of that provision is to avoid or contradict the custodial taking of unclaimed property by the administrator.

This act shall be liberally construed in favor of the state and so as to foster the report and turnover of unclaimed property to the administrator.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsections (a), (b)(iii) and (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Administrator” means the state treasurer;

“Apparent owner” means the person whose name appears on the records of the holder as the person entitled to property held, issued or owing by the holder;

“Attorney general” means the chief legal officer of this state;

“Banking organization” means a bank, trust company, savings bank, private banker or any organization defined by other law as a bank or banking organization;

“Business association” means a nonpublic corporation, joint stock company, investment company, business trust, partnership or association for business purposes of two (2) or more individuals, whether or not for profit, including a banking organization, financial organization, insurance company or utility;

“Domicile” means the state of incorporation of a corporation and the state of the principal place of business of an unincorporated person;

“Financial organization” means a savings and loan association, building and loan association or credit union;

“Holder” means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, who is:

In possession of property belonging to another;

A trustee; or

Indebted to another on an obligation.

“Insurance company” means an association, corporation, fraternal or mutual benefit organization, whether or not for profit, which is engaged in providing insurance coverage, including but not limited to accident, burial, casualty, credit life, contract performance, dental, fidelity, fire, health, hospitalization, illness, life (including endowments and annuities), malpractice, marine, mortgage, surety and wage protection insurance;

“Intangible property” includes:

Monies, checks, drafts, deposits, interest, dividends and income;

Credit balances, customer overpayments, gift certificates, merchant stored value cards, security deposits, refunds, credit memos, unpaid wages, unused airline tickets and unidentified remittances except balances represented on debit cards;

Stocks and other intangible ownership interests in business associations except patronage capital of Wyoming rural electric cooperatives;

Monies deposited to redeem stocks, bonds, coupons and other securities or to make distributions;

Bonds, notes and any other debt obligations;

Amounts due and payable under the terms of insurance policies;

Amounts distributable from a trust or custodial fund established under a plan to provide health, welfare, pension, vacation, severance, retirement, death, stock purchase, profit sharing, employee savings, supplemental unemployment insurance or similar benefits; and

Amounts distributable from a mineral interest in land.

“Last known address” means a description of the location of the apparent owner sufficient for the purpose of the delivery of mail;

“Mineral” means oil, gas, uranium, sulphur, lignite, coal and any other substance that is ordinarily and naturally considered a mineral, regardless of the depth at which the oil, gas, uranium, sulphur, lignite, coal or other substance is found;

“Mineral proceeds” includes:

All obligations to pay resulting from the production and sale of minerals, including net revenue interest, royalties, overriding royalties, production payments and joint operating agreements; and

All obligations for the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease, including bonuses, delay rentals, shut-in royalties and minimum royalties.

“Owner” means a depositor in the case of a deposit, a beneficiary in case of a trust other than a deposit in trust, a creditor, claimant or payee in the case of other intangible property or a person or that person’s legal representative having a legal or equitable interest in property subject to this act;

“Person” means an individual, business association, state or other government (including any governmental subdivision, agency, entity, officer or appointee thereof) public corporation, public authority, estate, trust, two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest or any other legal or commercial entity;

“State” means any state, district, commonwealth, territory, insular possession or any other area subject to the legislative authority of the United States;

“Utility” means a person who owns or operates for public use any plant, equipment, property, franchise or license for the transmission of communications, including cable television or the production, storage, transmission, sale, delivery or furnishing of electricity, water, steam or gas;

“Merchant stored value card” means an electronic promise that is:

Redeemable at a single merchant or an affiliated group of merchants that share the same name, mark or logo;

Issued in a specified amount, whether or not that amount may be increased in value or reloaded at the request of the owner of the card;

Purchased on a prepaid basis in exchange for payment;

Upon presentation, honored by a single merchant or affiliated group of merchants for goods or services; and

Not:

Distributed under an awards, rewards, loyalty, incentive, rebate or promotional program; or

Sold below face value or donated to an employee, nonprofit organization or an education institution for fund raising.

“This act” means W.S.

34-24-101

through

34-24-140

.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1994, ch. 101, § 2; 2015 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(x)(B), inserted “merchant stored value cards”; added present (a)(xviii); redesignated former (a)(xviii) as (a)(xix); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 34-24-103.
Property deemed abandoned; general rule.

Except as otherwise provided by this act, all intangible property, including any income or increment derived therefrom, less any lawful charges, that is held, issued or owing in the ordinary course of a holder’s business and has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after it became payable or distributable is deemed abandoned.

Property is payable or distributable for the purpose of this act notwithstanding the owner’s failure to make demand or to present any instrument or document required to receive payment.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in both subsections, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-104.
General rules for taking custody of intangible unclaimed property.

Unless otherwise provided in this act or by other statute of this state, intangible property is subject to the custody of this state as unclaimed property if the property is deemed abandoned under W.S.

34-24-103

and

34-24-106

through

34-24-117

and

34-24-140

are satisfied and:

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the identity of the person entitled to the property and it is established that the last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address of the apparent owner and it is established that:

The last known address of the person entitled to the property is in this state; or

The holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state and has not previously paid or delivered the property to the state of the last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property.

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state;

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in a foreign nation and the holder is a domiciliary or a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or

The transaction out of which the property arose occurred in this state and:

The holder is a domiciliary of a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property; and

The last known address of the apparent owner or other person entitled to the property is:

Unknown; or

In a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1994, ch. 101, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-105.
Traveler's checks and money orders.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, any sum payable on a traveler’s check that has been outstanding for more than fifteen (15) years after its issuance is deemed abandoned unless the owner, within fifteen (15) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

Subject to subsection (d) of this section, any sum payable on a money order that has been outstanding for more than seven (7) years after its issuance is deemed abandoned unless the owner, within seven (7) years, has communicated in writing with the issuer concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the issuer.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of a traveler’s check or money order any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the issuer and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the issuer may impose a charge and the issuer regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

No sum payable on a traveler’s check or money order described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may be subjected to the custody of this state as unclaimed property unless:

The records of the issuer show that the traveler’s check or money order was purchased in this state;

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state and the records of the issuer do not show the state in which the traveler’s check or money order was purchased; or

The issuer has its principal place of business in this state, the records of the issuer show the state in which the traveler’s check or money order was purchased, and the laws of the state of purchase do not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or its escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, subsection (d) of this section applies to sums payable on traveler’s checks or money orders deemed abandoned on the effective date of this act.

As used in this section, “money order” means a money order issued by a business association and includes a personal money order or other similar instrument issued by a banking or financial organization, but not a bank money order, which is deemed a cashier’s check.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-106.
Checks, drafts and similar instruments issued or certified by banking and financial organizations.

Any sum payable on a check, draft or similar instrument, except those subject to W.S.

34-24-105

, on which a banking or financial organization is directly liable, including a cashier’s check and a certified check, which has been outstanding for more than five (5) years after it was payable or after its issuance if payable on demand, is deemed abandoned, unless the owner, within five (5) years, has communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning it or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee thereof.

A holder may not deduct from the amount of any instrument subject to this section any charge imposed by reason of the failure to present the instrument for payment unless there is a valid and enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the instrument pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge, and the holder regularly imposes such charges and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-107.
Bank deposits and funds in financial organizations.

Any demand, savings or matured time deposit with a banking or financial organization, including a deposit that is automatically renewable, and any funds paid toward the purchase of a share, a mutual investment certificate or any other interest in a banking or financial organization is deemed abandoned after five (5) years if the location of the owner is unknown, except where the owner, within five (5) years, has:

In the case of a deposit, increased or decreased its amount or presented the passbook or other similar evidence of the deposit for the crediting of interest;

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization concerning the property;

Otherwise indicated an interest in the property as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization;

Owned other property to which paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection applies and if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be deemed abandoned under this subsection at the address to which communications regarding the other property regularly are sent; or

Had another relationship with the banking or financial organization concerning which the owner has:

Communicated in writing with the banking or financial organization; or

Otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the banking or financial organization and if the banking or financial organization communicates in writing with the owner with regard to the property that would otherwise be abandoned under this subsection at the address to which communications regarding the other relationship regularly are sent.

For purposes of subsection (a) of this section, property includes interest and dividends.

A holder may not impose with respect to property described in subsection (a) of this section any charge due to dormancy or inactivity or cease payment of interest unless:

There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the property pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge or cease payment of interest and the holder regularly imposes such charges or ceases payment of interest and does not regularly reverse or otherwise cancel them or retroactively credit interest with respect to the property; or

The holder is specifically exempted by federal law.

Any property described in subsection (a) of this section that is automatically renewable is matured for purposes of subsection (a) of this section upon the expiration of its initial time period, but in the case of any renewal to which the owner consents at or about the time of renewal by communicating in writing with the banking or financial organization or otherwise indicating consent as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the organization, the property is matured upon the expiration of the last time period for which consent was given. If, at the time provided for delivery in W.S.

34-24-120

, a penalty or forfeiture in the payment of interest would result from the delivery of the property, the time for delivery is extended until the time when no penalty or forfeiture would result.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-108.
Funds owing under life insurance policies.

Funds held or owing under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract that has matured or terminated are deemed abandoned if unclaimed for more than five (5) years after the funds became due and payable as established from the records of the insurance company holding or owing the funds, but property described in paragraph (c)(ii) of this section is deemed abandoned if unclaimed for more than two (2) years.

If a person other than the insured or annuitant is entitled to the funds and an address of the person is not known to the company or it is not definite and certain from the records of the company who is entitled to the funds, it is presumed that the last known address of the person entitled to the funds is the same as the last known address of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company.

For purposes of this act, a life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract not matured by actual proof of the death of the insured or annuitant according to the records of the company is matured and the proceeds due and payable if:

The company knows that the insured or annuitant has died; or

It is determined that:

The insured has attained, or would have attained if living, the limiting age under the mortality table on which the reserve is based;

The policy was in force at the time the insured attained, or would have attained, the limiting age specified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; and

Neither the insured nor any other person appearing to have an interest in the policy within the preceding two (2) years, according to the records of the company, has assigned, readjusted or paid premiums on the policy, subjected the policy to a loan, corresponded in writing with the company concerning the policy or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by an employee of the company.

For purposes of this act, the application of an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision contained in an insurance policy does not prevent a policy from being matured or terminated under subsection (a) of this section if the insured has died or the insured or the beneficiary of the policy otherwise has become entitled to the proceeds thereof before the depletion of the cash surrender value of a policy by the application of those provisions.

If the laws of this state or the terms of the life insurance policy require the company to give notice to the insured or owner that an automatic premium loan provision or other nonforfeiture provision has been exercised and the notice, given to an insured or owner whose last known address according to the records of the company is in this state, is undeliverable, the company shall make a reasonable search to ascertain the policyholder’s correct address to which the notice must be mailed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the company learns of the death of the insured or annuitant and the beneficiary has not communicated with the insurer within four (4) months after the death, the company shall take reasonable steps to pay the proceeds to the beneficiary.

Commencing two (2) years after the effective date of this act, every change of beneficiary form issued by an insurance company under any life or endowment insurance policy or annuity contract to an insured or owner who is a resident of this state shall request the following information:

The name of each beneficiary, or if a class of beneficiaries is named, the name of each current beneficiary in the class;

The address of each beneficiary; and

The relationship of each beneficiary to the insured.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-109.
Deposits held by utilities.

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a deposit, including any interest thereon, made by a subscriber with a utility to secure payment or any sum paid in advance for utility services to be furnished, less any lawful deductions, that remains unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after termination of the services for which the deposit or advance payment was made is deemed abandoned.

The provisions of this act shall not apply to deposits or advance payments made to a cooperative utility subject to the provisions of the Wyoming Cooperative Utilities Act.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 2021 ch. 127, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added the (a) designation; in (a), added "Subject to subsection (b) of this section," at the beginning and made a related change; and added (b).

§ 34-24-110.
Refunds and payments resulting from judicial or administrative proceedings.

The sum to be paid as a refund, under an order or decision of a court or administrative agency or by agreement, remaining unclaimed for more than six (6) months after it became payable, is deemed abandoned, regardless of whether the apparent owner has made any claim to the refund, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the apparent owner and the holder concerning that sum.

Any sum payable or intangible property distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution or liquidation, remaining unclaimed for six (6) months after the date of the final distribution or liquidation, is deemed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been communication between the apparent owner and the person making the payment or distribution concerning that sum or distribution.

Intangible property payable or distributable to a member of or participant in a class action, either one allowed by the court to be maintained as such or one essentially handled as a class action, and remaining unclaimed for more than six (6) months after the time for the final payment or distribution is deemed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the member or participant and the holder concerning the property.

Intangible property payable or distributable as the result of litigation or settlement of a dispute before a judicial or administrative body and remaining unclaimed for more than six (6) months after the time for the final payment or distribution is deemed abandoned, unless, within the preceding six (6) months, there has been a communication between the apparent owner and the holder concerning the property.

The person actually making or having the duty to make payment or distribution shall be deemed the holder for the purpose of this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-111.
Stock and other intangible interests in business associations.

Any stock, shareholding, or other intangible ownership interest in a business association, the existence of which is evidenced by records available to the association, is deemed abandoned and, with respect to the interest, the association is the holder, if:

The interest in the association is owned by a person who for more than three (3) years has neither claimed a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as a result of the interest, or who has not communicated with the association regarding the interest or a dividend, distribution or other sum payable as the result of the interest, as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the association prepared by an employee of the association; and

The association does not know the location of the owner at the end of the three (3) year period.

The return of official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal service as undeliverable shall be evidence that the association does not know the location of the owner.

This act shall be applicable to both the underlying stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interests of an owner, and any stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interest of which the business association is in possession of the certificate or other evidence or indicia of ownership, and to the stock, shareholdings or other intangible ownership interests of dividend and nondividend paying business associations whether or not the interest is represented by a certificate.

At the time an interest is deemed abandoned under this section, any dividend, distribution or other sum then held for or owing to the owner as a result of the interest, and not previously deemed abandoned, is deemed abandoned.

This act does not apply to any stock or other intangible ownership interest enrolled in a plan that provides for the automatic reinvestment of dividends, distributions or other sums payable as a result of the interest unless:

The records available to the administrator of the plan show, with respect to any intangible ownership interest not enrolled in the reinvestment plan that the owner has not within three (3) years communicated in any manner described in subsection (a) of this section; or

Three (3) years have elapsed since the location of the owner became unknown to the association, as evidenced by the return of official shareholder notifications or communications by the postal service as undeliverable, and the owner has not within those three (3) years communicated in any manner described in subsection (a) of this section. The three (3) year period from the return of official shareholder notifications or communications shall commence from the earlier of the return of the second such mailing or the time the holder discontinues mailings to the shareholder.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 1998, ch. 92, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in subsection (c) and in the introductory language of subsection (e), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-112.
Property held by agents and fiduciaries.

All intangible property and any income or increment derived therefrom, held in a fiduciary capacity for the benefit of another person is deemed abandoned unless the owner, within five (5) years after it has become payable or distributable, has increased or decreased the principal, accepted payment of principal or income, communicated concerning the property or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file prepared by the fiduciary.

All intangible property and any income or increment derived therefrom held in an individual retirement account, a retirement plan for self-employed individuals, or similar account or plan established pursuant to the internal revenue laws of the United States, which has not been paid or distributed for more than ninety (90) days after the earliest of (1) the actual date of distribution or attempted distribution, (2) the date contracted for distribution in the plan or trust agreement governing the account or plan, or (3) the date specified in the internal revenue law of the United States by which distribution must begin in order to avoid a tax penalty, is deemed abandoned unless the owner or beneficiary, within five (5) preceding years has made additional payments or transfers of property to the account or plan, was paid or received a distribution, communicated concerning the property, or otherwise indicated an interest as evidenced by a memorandum or other record on file with the account or plan fiduciary.

For the purpose of this section, a person who holds property as an agent for a business association is deemed to hold the property in a fiduciary capacity for that business association alone, unless the agreement between him and the business association provides otherwise.

For the purposes of this act, a person who is deemed to hold property in a fiduciary capacity for a business association alone is the holder of the property only insofar as the interest of the business association in the property is concerned, and the business association is the holder of the property insofar as the interest of any other person in the property is concerned.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in subsection (d), see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-113.
Property held by courts and public agencies.

Any intangible property held by the executive, legislative or judicial branch of the United States government, or a state or a county or municipal subdivision of a state, or any of their authorities, agencies, instrumentalities, administrations, services or other organizations, and remaining unclaimed for more than one (1) year after it became payable or distributable is deemed abandoned.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-114.
Gift certificates, merchant stored value cards and credit memos.

Except as provided by subsection (e) of this section, a gift certificate, merchant stored value card or a credit memo is deemed abandoned if the balance remaining is greater than one hundred dollars ($100.00) and it remains unredeemed for more than five (5) years after the later of its issuance date or the last activity by its owner, including partial use, or in the case of a merchant stored value card, an increase in the card balance purchased by the owner.

In the case of a gift certificate or merchant stored value card, the amount deemed abandoned is the balance on the gift certificate or merchant stored value card as of the day of abandonment. In the case of a credit memo, the amount deemed abandoned is the amount credited as shown on the memo itself.

The amount of a gift certificate, merchant stored value card or credit memo deemed abandoned is subject to the custody of this state in the following circumstances:

The records of the issuer show that the last known address of the purchaser of the certificate, merchant stored value card or recipient of the memo is in this state;

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 127 § 2.

The records of the issuer do not show the address of the purchaser or of the recipient and the issuer is a domiciliary of this state; or

The records of the issuer show that the address of the purchaser or recipient is in or is a state whose escheat or unclaimed property law does not provide for the escheat or custodial taking of gift certificates, merchant stored value cards and credit memos, and the issuer is a domiciliary of this state.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 127 § 2.

A gift certificate or merchant stored value card which has no expiration date and does not impose a fee of any kind in relation to the sale, redemption or replacement of the certificate or card, other than an initial charge not exceeding the face value of the certificate or card, is exempt from the requirements of this section.

Repealed by Laws 2016, ch. 73, § 1.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 2015 ch. 127, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “merchant stored value card” in (a), (b), the introductory language of (c), (c)(i), and (c)(iv); rewrote (a) and (b); repealed former (c)(ii), which read: “The records of the issuer do not show the address of the purchaser or recipient, but do show that the certificate or memo was issued in this state”; in (c)(iii),
deleted “do not show the state where the certificate or memo was issued, but” following “recipient and”; in (c)(iv), deleted “or if none, the state where the certificate or memo was issued” following “purchaser or recipient”; repealed former (d), pertaining to records business associations issuing a gift certificate or credit memo need to keep; added (e) and (f); and made related changes.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, repealed (f), which read, “This section is repealed effective July 1, 2019.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

§ 34-24-115.
Wages.

Unpaid wages, including wages represented by unpresented payroll checks, owing in the ordinary course of the holder’s business which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than one (1) year after becoming payable are deemed abandoned.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-116.
Contents of safe deposit box or other safekeeping repository.

All tangible and intangible property held in a safe deposit box or any other safekeeping repository in this state in the ordinary course of the holder’s business and proceeds resulting from the sale of the property permitted by other law, which remain unclaimed by the owner for more than five (5) years after the lease or rental period on the box or other repository has expired, are deemed abandoned.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 34-24-117.
Mineral proceeds.

Any sum payable as mineral proceeds that has remained unclaimed by the owner for more than three (3) years after it became payable or distributable and the owner’s underlying right to receive those mineral proceeds are deemed abandoned.

At the time an owner’s underlying right to receive mineral proceeds is deemed abandoned, any mineral proceeds then owing to the owner and any proceeds accruing after that time are deemed abandoned. The sum deemed abandoned is subject to the custody of this state as unclaimed property if:

The last known address, as shown on the records of the holder, of the apparent owner is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address and it is established that the last known address of the apparent owner is in this state;

The records of the holder do not reflect the last known address, and the holder is domiciled in or is a government or governmental subdivision or agency of this state; or

The mineral interest is located in this state, and:

The last known address of the apparent owner, as shown on the records of the holder, is in a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or is in a state in which the state’s escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property; or

The last known address of the apparent owner is unknown and the holder is a domiciliary of a state that does not provide by law for the escheat or custodial taking of the property or a state in which the state escheat or unclaimed property law is not applicable to the property.

A holder may not deduct from mineral proceeds any charge due to dormancy unless:

There is an enforceable written contract between the holder and the owner of the mineral proceeds pursuant to which the holder may impose a charge;

For mineral proceeds in excess of five dollars ($5.00), the holder, no more than three (3) months before the initial imposition of those charges, has mailed written notice to the owner of the amount of those charges at the last known address of the owner stating that those charges will be imposed, provided the notice required in this paragraph need not be given with respect to charges imposed before the effective date of this act; and

The holder regularly imposes such charges and in no instance reverses or otherwise cancels them.

Charges authorized under subsection (c) of this section may be made and collected monthly, quarterly or annually. However, beginning with the effective date of this act, the cumulative amount of charges may not exceed twelve dollars ($12.00) per year, and may only be charged for a maximum of two (2) calendar years.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 213, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “or” at the end of (b)(ii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 34-24-102(a)(xviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”